en: Bow material: Aluminum; Carbon fiber; Composite; Fiberglass; Foam; Wood; Other
vi: Chất liệu nơ: Nhôm; Sợi carbon; Tổng hợp; Sợi thủy tinh; Bọt xốp; Gỗ; Khác
th: วัสดุสำหรับคันธนู: อะลูมิเนียม; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; โฟม; ไม้; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό τόξου: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακόνημα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Υαλοβάμβακας; Αφρός; Ξύλο; Άλλο
nl: Boogmateriaal: Aluminium; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Glasvezel; Schuim; Hout; Andere
de: Bogenmaterial: Aluminium; Kohlenstofffaser; Zusammengesetzt; Fiberglas; Schaumstoff; Holz; Sonstiges
it: Materiale dell’arco: Alluminio; Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Vetroresina; Schiuma; Legno; Altro
pt-BR: Material do arco: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Espuma; Madeira; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal luka: Aluminij; Karbonska vlakna; Kompozit; Stakloplastika; Pjena; Drvo; Ostalo
sv: Bågmaterial: Aluminium; Kolfiber; Sammansatt; Glasfiber; Skum; Trä; Övrigt
bg-BG: Материал на лъка: Алуминий; Въглеродни влакна; Композит; Fiberglass; Пяна; Дърво; Други
ru: Материал лука для стрельбы: Алюминий; Углеродное волокно; Композит; Стеклопластик; Поролон; Дерево; Другое
pl: Materiał łuku: Aluminium; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Włókno szklane; Piana; Drewno; Inne
sk-SK: Materiál luku: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Pena; Drevo; Iné
fr: Matériau de l’arc: Aluminum; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Fibre de verre; Mousse; Bois; Autre
da: Buemateriale: Aluminum; Kulfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Skum; Træ; Andet
nb: Buemateriale: Aluminium; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Glassfiber; Skum; Trevirke; Annet
ja: 弓の素材: アルミニウム; カーボンファイバー; 複合; ガラス繊維; フォーム; 木材; その他
zh-TW: 弓材質: 鋁; 碳纖維; 複合; 玻璃纖維; 泡棉; 木材; 其他
lt-LT: Lanko medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Stiklo pluoštas; Porolonas; Mediena; Kita
ro-RO: Material arc: Aluminiu; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Fibră de sticlă; Spumă; Lemn; Altele
hu: Íj anyaga: Alumínium; Szénszálas; Kompozit; Üveggyapot; Hab; Fa; Egyéb
tr: Yay malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Fiberglas; Köpük; Ahşap; Diğer
sl-SI: Material lokostrelskega loka: Aluminij; Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Steklena vlakna; Pena; Les; Drugo
cs: Materiál luku: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozitní; Skelná vata; Pěna; Dřevo; Jiné
ko: 활 소재: 알루미늄; 탄소 섬유; 복합물; 유리 섬유; 거품; 목재; 기타
zh-CN: 弓材质: 铝; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 玻璃纤维; 泡沫; 木头; 其他
es: Material del arco: Aluminio; Fibra de carbono; Compuesto; Fibra de vidrio; Espuma; Madera; Otros
fi: Jousen materiaali: Alumiini; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Lasikuitu; Vaahto; Puu; Muu
pt-PT: Material do arco: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Espuma; Madeira; Outro